Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5436.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406uu. (1) Subject to subsection (3), an insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy shall provide coverage for hearing aids or hearing-related services and devices for the treatment of hearing loss for a qualified enrollee that are selected by an audiologist after evaluation of the qualified enrollee. The maximum required coverage under this subsection is $3,000.00 per hearing aid every 36 months. Beginning January 1, 2026 and each January 1 after that date, the department shall adjust the maximum coverage amount under this subsection in accordance with the Consumer Price Index as that term is defined in section 2080. (2) A qualified enrollee may choose to purchase a hearing aid that exceeds the maximum required coverage amount under subsection (1). If a qualified enrollee chooses to purchase a hearing aid that exceeds the maximum required coverage amount, the qualified enrollee is responsible for the difference. (3) An insurer may subject coverage under this section to applicable cost-sharing, including deductible, co-insurance, or co-pay provisions of the health insurance policy. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Audiologist" means that term as defined in section 16801 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16801. (b) "Hearing aid" means a wearable, nondisposable instrument or device, including any parts, attachments, or accessories, designed or offered to aid or compensate impaired human hearing. (c) "Hearing-related services and devices" includes all of the following: (i) Audiological examinations and services necessary to assess, select, and adjust or fit a hearing aid to ensure optimal performance. (ii) Hearing aid evaluations, programming, conformity evaluations or prescription verification measures, servicing, maintenance, and repairs. (iii) Remote microphones. (iv) Earmolds and replacement earmolds. (v) Auditory training and speech language habilitation by an audiologist and speech language pathologist. (d) "Qualified enrollee" means an enrollee to whom all of the following apply: (i) An audiologist has evaluated the enrollee for hearing loss. (ii) After an audiologist has evaluated the enrollee under subparagraph (i), an otolaryngologist has medically evaluated the enrollee, has determined that the enrollee is a candidate for a hearing aid, and has referred the enrollee to the audiologist for evaluation, selection, and fitting.